local/incubator/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="/eus__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ac’hanon</l>
          <r>eus<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ac’hanout</l>
          <r>eus<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anezhañ</l>
          <r>eus<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anezhi</l>
          <r>eus<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ac’hanomp</l>
          <r>eus<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ac’hanoc’h</l>
          <r>eus<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anezho</l>
          <r>eus<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/goude__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em<b/>goude</l>
          <r>goude<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez<b/>koude</l>
          <r>goude<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en<b/>e<b/>c’houde</l>
          <r>goude<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en<b/>he<b/>goude</l>
          <r>goude<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en<b/>hor<b/>goude</l>
          <r>goude<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en<b/>ho<b/>koude</l>
          <r>goude<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en<b/>o<b/>goude</l>
          <r>goude<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="war__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>non</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nout</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nañ</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nezhañ</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nezhi</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nomp</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>noc’h</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>no</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nezho</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="met__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ouzhpenn__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Noms -->

    <pardef n="kilh/og__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eien</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="noz__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ioù</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bleiz__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kan__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="enselladur__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iou</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rev__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejer</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kere__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="skor__n">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ioù</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="biz__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="itron__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezed</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gougleze__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ier</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lounezh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="eus"><i></i><par n="/eus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="goude"><i></i><par n="/goude__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="war"><i>war</i><par n="war__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="eta"><i>eta</i><par n="met__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ha"><i>ha</i><par n="met__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="hag"><i>hag</i><par n="met__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="met"><i>met</i><par n="met__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="itron"><i>itron</i><par n="itron__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keniterv"><i>keniterv</i><par n="itron__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kentel"><i>kentel</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kilhog"><i>kilh</i><par n="kilh/og__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sizhun"><i>sizhun</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aloubidigezh"><i>aloubidigezh</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bac’h"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ac’h</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biz"><par n="initial-b"/><i>iz</i><par n="biz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bleiz"><par n="initial-b"/><i>leiz</i><par n="bleiz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="c’hoar"><i>c’hoar</i><par n="itron__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dileuridigezh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ileuridigezh</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dollar"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ollar</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enselladur"><i>enselladur</i><par n="enselladur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eñvor"><i>eñvor</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ergerzh"><i>ergerzh</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="galvidigezh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>alvidigezh</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glin"><par n="initial-g"/><i>lin</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gougleze"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ougleze</i><par n="gougleze__n"/></e>
    <e lm="groc’h"><par n="initial-g"/><i>roc’h</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwanded"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>anded</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="impalaer"><i>impalaer</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="itron"><i>itron</i><par n="itron__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jedouer"><i>jedouer</i><par n="skor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaier"><par n="initial-k"/><i>aier</i><par n="skor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kanol"><par n="initial-k"/><i>anol</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kan"><par n="initial-k"/><i>an</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karrdi"><par n="initial-k"/><i>arrdi</i><par n="skor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kere"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ere</i><par n="kere__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kevroz"><par n="initial-k"/><i>evroz</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kren"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ren</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laer"><i>laer</i><par n="kere__n"/></e>
    <e lm="loar"><i>loar</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lounezh"><i>lounezh</i><par n="lounezh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marzh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>arzh</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="morlaer"><par n="initial-m"/><i>orlaer</i><par n="kere__n"/></e>
    <e lm="morvleiz"><par n="initial-m"/><i>orvleiz</i><par n="bleiz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mouezh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ouezh</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ober"><i>ober</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pellder"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ellder</i><par n="skor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pleg"><par n="initial-p"/><i>leg</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reober"><i>reober</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rev"><i>rev</i><par n="rev__n"/></e>
    <e lm="santidigezh"><i>santidigezh</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skor"><i>skor</i><par n="skor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="toal"><par n="initial-t"/><i>oal</i><par n="kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="a-ratozh"><i>a-ratozh</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="a-wezhioù"><i>a-wezhioù</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ac'hanen"><i>ac'hanen</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="adarre"><i>adarre</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="arabat"><i>arabat</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bemnoz"><i>bemnoz</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="buan"><i>buan</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dindan"><i>dindan</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dres"><i>dres</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gwechall"><i>gwechall</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ken"><i>ken</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mañ"><i>mañ</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ne"><i>ne</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="warc’hoazh"><i>warc’hoazh</i><par n="ouzhpenn__adv"/></e>
